Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2602.02
Contract; statement required.

The following statement shall appear in capitalized, underlined type adjoining the signature block of any standardized agreement in which binding arbitration is the sole remedy for dispute resolution: THIS CONTRACT CONTAINS AN ARBITRATION PROVISION WHICH MAY BE ENFORCED BY THE PARTIES.

Laws 1997, LB 151, § 7.

When a contract containing an arbitration clause is governed by federal law, the failure to include the statutory language of this section does not make the arbitration clause unenforceable. Aramark Uniform & Career Apparel v. Hunan, Inc., 276 Neb. 700, 757 N.W.2d 205 (2008).

When a contract which attempts to establish binding arbitration as the sole remedy fails to strictly comply with this section, the arbitration clause is voidable and unenforceable. Kramer v. Eagle Eye Home Inspections, 14 Neb. App. 691, 716 N.W.2d 749 (2006).